test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-pini37_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pini: # Noun (37) pini 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    pini+N+Sg+Nom: pini
    pini+N+Sg+Gen: pini
    pini+N+Sg+Par: pinni
    pini+N+Sg+Ill: pinni
    pini+N+Sg+Ine: [pinin, pinih, pinihn]
    pini+N+Sg+Ela: pinist
    pini+N+Sg+All: pinile
    pini+N+Sg+Ade: pinil
    pini+N+Sg+Abl: pinilt
    pini+N+Sg+Tra: pinis
    pini+N+Sg+Ter: pininiq
    pini+N+Sg+Abe: pinildäq
    pini+N+Sg+Com: pinigaq
    pini+N+Pl+Nom: piniq
    pini+N+Pl+Gen: pinne
    pini+N+Pl+Par: pinne
    pini+N+Pl+Ill: [pinnehe, pinne, pinnede]
    pini+N+Pl+Ine: [pinen, pineh, pinehn, pinnen, pinneh, pinnehn]
    pini+N+Pl+Ela: [pinest, pinnest]
    pini+N+Pl+All: [pinele, pinnele]
    pini+N+Pl+Ade: [pinel, pinnel]
    pini+N+Pl+Abl: [pinelt, pinnelt]
    pini+N+Pl+Tra: [pines, pinnes]
    pini+N+Pl+Ter: [pineniq, pinneniq]
    pini+N+Pl+Abe: [pineldäq, pinneldäq]
    pini+N+Pl+Com: pinnegaq
